North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.7 Dry Pea and Lentil Council [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.7-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-02.
Dry pea and lentil council — Membership — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-03.
Dry pea and lentil council — Election. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-04.
Dry pea and lentil districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-05.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation of council members. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-06.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-07.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-08.
Certification of first purchasers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-09.
Assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-10.
Collection of assessment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-11.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-12.
Advisory referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-13.
Collection of unpaid assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-14.
Penalty for nonpayment of assessments. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-15.
Continuing appropriation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-16.
Records of the council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.7-17.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.